California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) Prior to the acquisition of land or any interest therein, including tide and submerged lands or other lands subject to the public trust for commerce, navigation, or fisheries, by any political subdivision for the purpose of expanding or enlarging any existing publicly owned airport, the acquiring entity shall submit a plan of that expansion or enlargement to the board of supervisors of the county, or the city council of the city, in which the property proposed to be acquired is located.

(b) The plan shall show in detail the airport-related uses and other uses proposed for the property to be acquired.

(c) The board of supervisors or the city council, as the case may be, shall, upon notice, conduct a public hearing on the plan, and shall thereafter approve or disapprove the plan.

(d) Upon approval of the plan, the proposed acquisition of property may begin.

(e) The use of property so acquired shall thereafter conform to the approved plan, and any variance from that plan, or changes proposed therein, shall first be approved by the appropriate board of supervisors or city council after a public hearing on the subject of the variance or plan change.

(f) The requirements of this section are in addition to any other requirements of law relating to construction or expansion of airports.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 534, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

21662.

The department shall have the authority to issue airport site approval permits, amended airport site approval permits, airport permits, and amended airport permits. No charge shall be made for the issuance of any permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

21662.1.

(a) At or as near as practical to the site of a medical emergency and at a medical facility, an officer authorized by a public safety agency may designate an area for the landing and taking off of an emergency service helicopter, in accordance with regulations established not later than January 1, 1989, pursuant to Section 21243.

(b) “Public safety agency” means any city, county, state agency, or special purpose district authorized to arrange for emergency medical services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1215, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

21662.4.

(a) Emergency aircraft flights for medical purposes by law enforcement, firefighting, military, or other persons who provide emergency flights for medical purposes are exempt from local ordinances adopted by a city, county, or city and county, whether general law or chartered, that restrict flight departures and arrivals to particular hours of the day or night, that restrict the departure or arrival of aircraft based upon the aircraft’s noise level, or that restrict the operation of certain types of aircraft.

(b) As used in this section, “emergency aircraft flights for medical purposes” are those flights in which undue delay would threaten a patient’s life. “Emergency aircraft
 flights for medical purposes” include, but are not limited to, flights for the transportation of any of the following:

(1) Patients accompanied by licensed or certificated medical attendants such as paramedics, nurses, physicians, and respiratory therapists.

(2) Surgical transplant teams for the purpose of procuring human organs for reimplantation in recipients.

(3) Organ procurement agency coordinators responding to a potential donor.

(4) Temporarily viable human organs such as a heart, liver, lungs, kidneys, and pancreas, and human tissue, blood, or blood components.

(5) Human tissue and blood samples for clinical testing to determine compatibility between a donor and a recipient.

(6) Mechanical adjuncts or biological replacements for human organs.

(7) Medical equipment and supplies.

(8) Aircraft or equipment used during a medical emergency, or emergency personnel and first responders involved in treating the medical emergency, for the purpose of returning to its base of operation.

“Emergency aircraft flights for medical purposes” do not include the transportation of medical personnel to attend seminars, conferences, or speaking appearances in which undue delay would not jeopardize any patient’s medical condition.

(c) (1) Written information concerning the emergency shall be submitted to the airport proprietor for all emergency aircraft flights within 72 hours prior or
 subsequent to the departure or arrival of the aircraft. For all emergency aircraft flights for medical purposes, the information shall include the patient’s name and address, the names of medical attendants or personnel and the discipline in which they are licensed or hold a certificate to practice, a signed statement by the attending physician specifying that a medical emergency was involved, the requesting medical facility or agency, the intended destination, the type and registration number of the aircraft, and the names of all flight crew members, provided that the disclosure is authorized by and made in a manner consistent with the standards with respect to the privacy of individually identifiable health information of Title II (commencing with Section 200) of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191), the regulations issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to that act (45 C.F.R. Pts. 160 and 164), and the
 Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code).

(2) This subdivision does not apply to emergency aircraft flights for medical purposes by law enforcement, firefighting, or military personnel.

(d) Any airport that incurs additional expenses in order to accommodate the arrival or departure of emergency aircraft flights for medical purposes may charge the patient on whose behalf the flight is made, or any organization or entity which has volunteered to reimburse the airport, for those expenses.

(e) For emergency aircraft flights for medical purposes, when two airports are located in the same geographical area, and one of the airports is a “closed” or restricted airport, the Legislature encourages the use of the “open” or unrestricted airport when
 feasible, rather than using the “closed” or restricted airport.

(f) When leasing aircraft for flights for emergency medical purposes, the Legislature encourages the use, when feasible, of aircraft which comply with local noise ordinances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 54, Sec. 1.   (AB 1660)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21662.5.

Notwithstanding Section 21006 or Section 21661 or any other provision of law to the contrary, no helicopter may land or depart in any area within 1,000 feet, measured by air line, of the boundary of any public or private school maintaining kindergarten classes or any classes in grades 1 through 12, without approval of the department or by a public safety agency designated by the department, unless the landing or departure takes place at a permitted permanent heliport, or is a designated emergency medical service landing site.

Before approval of the landing or departure of a helicopter pursuant to this section, all schools within the specified area shall be notified by the department or public safety agency of the application and shall have 15 days after the notice in which to demand a public hearing. The public hearing shall be held at a location in the immediate vicinity of the landing or departure site. The department or public safety agency shall not grant approval pursuant to this section unless it has first found that helicopter operations at the proposed site can be conducted in a safe manner, and in accordance with criteria established by the department.

This section shall not prevent the governing body of any city or county from enacting ordinances or regulations imposing restrictions equal to or greater than those imposed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 21.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

21663.

It is unlawful for any political subdivision, any of its officers or employees, or any person to operate an airport unless an appropriate airport permit required by rule of the department has been issued by the department and has not subsequently been revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 712.)
-------------------------------------------

21664.

Any political subdivision or person planning to construct, establish, or expand an airport shall apply for the appropriate permit from the department prior to the construction, establishment or expansion. The application shall set forth the location of all highways, railways, wires, cables, poles, fences, schools, residential areas and places of public gathering, and any other information as may be required by the rules and regulations of the department. Whenever an airport owned or operated by the United States ceases to be so owned or operated, any political subdivision or person desiring or planning to own or operate the airport shall apply to the department in compliance with the provisions of this article. If the airport holds a permit issued by the department, the application shall be confined to consideration of the matters enumerated in subdivision (e) of Section 21666.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 22.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

21664.5.

(a) An amended airport permit shall be required for every expansion of an existing airport. An applicant for an amended airport permit shall comply with each requirement of this article pertaining to permits for new airports. The department may by regulation provide for exemptions from the operation of this section pursuant to Section 21661, except that no exemption shall be made limiting the applicability of subdivision (e) of Section 21666, pertaining to environmental considerations, including the requirement for public hearings in connection therewith.

(b) As used in this section, “airport expansion” includes any of the following:

(1) The acquisition of runway protection zones, as defined in Federal Aviation Administration Advisory Circular 150/1500-13, or of any interest in land for the purpose of any other expansion as set forth in this section.

(2) The construction of a new runway.

(3) The extension or realignment of an existing runway.

(4) Any other expansion of the airport’s physical facilities for the purpose of accomplishing or which are related to the purpose of paragraph (1), (2), or (3).

(c) This section does not apply to any expansion of an existing airport if the expansion commenced on or prior to the effective date of this section and the expansion met the approval, on or prior to that effective date, of each governmental agency that required the approval by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

21666.

The department shall issue a permit if it is satisfied that all of the following requirements have been met:

(a) The site meets or exceeds the minimum airport standards specified by the department in its rules and regulations, provided, however, that the department may modify its minimum airport standards when issuing a permit if it is satisfied that the airport will conform to minimum standards of safety.

(b) Safe air traffic patterns have been established for the proposed airport and for all existing airports and approved airport sites in its vicinity.

(c) The zone of approach of the airport has been engineered in conformity with the provisions of Section 21403, the documents relating thereto are available for public inspection.

(d) The department when issuing a permit may impose reasonable conditions which it deems necessary to effectuate the purposes of this article.

(e) The advantages to the public in selection of the site of a proposed new airport outweigh the disadvantages to the environment or, in the case of an amended permit, the advantages to the public of the proposed airport expansion outweigh the disadvantages to the environment. Environmental considerations include but are not limited to noise, air pollution, and the burden upon the surrounding area caused by the airport or airport expansion, including but not limited to, surface traffic and expense. The standards by which noise considerations are weighed shall be the level of noise acceptable to a reasonable person residing in the vicinity of the airport. The regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 21669 may be considered in determining such level of noise.

Each permit issued by the department shall set forth any conditions imposed thereon, and any modification of the general minimum airport standards prescribed by the department relative to such airport or airport site.

The department may refuse to issue a permit under this article if it determines that the requirements of this section have not been met. Any person denied a permit shall, upon request, be granted a hearing by the department to determine whether the permit should be issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1052.)
-------------------------------------------

21668.

The department may revoke any airport permit if it determines that any of the following conditions are present:

(a) There has been an abandonment of a site or an airport.

(b) There has been a failure within the time prescribed to develop the site as an airport or to comply with the conditions of the approval as set forth in the permit.

(c) The airport or site no longer conforms to the minimum airport standards prescribed by the department, or no longer complies with the conditions imposed in the airport permit or site approval.

(d) The owner or operator of a permitted airport has failed to comply with any rule or regulation of the department.

(e) The site may no longer be safely used by the general public because of a change in physical or legal conditions either on or off the airport site.

The department shall not revoke a permit under this section without prior notice or opportunity for hearing, unless the department determines in writing that public safety considerations require a summary revocation. In this event, any person aggrieved by the action of the department shall, upon request, be granted a hearing by the department to determine whether the revocation shall remain in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1052.)
-------------------------------------------

21668.2.

In lieu of revoking an airport permit pursuant to Section 21668, the department may suspend any airport permit, or may require suspension of operations of a portion of an airport, and such suspension shall remain in effect until the department determines that the conditions requiring the suspension no longer exist.

The department shall not order a suspension under this section without prior notice or opportunity for hearing, unless the department determines in writing that public safety considerations require a summary suspension. In this event, any person aggrieved by the action of the department shall, upon request, be granted a hearing by the department to determine whether the suspension shall remain in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1052.)
-------------------------------------------

21669.

The department shall adopt noise standards governing the operation of aircraft and aircraft engines for airports operating under a valid permit issued by the department to an extent not prohibited by federal law. The standards shall be based upon the level of noise acceptable to a reasonable person residing in the vicinity of the airport.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1585.)
-------------------------------------------

21669.1.

(a) Land use conversion involving existing residential communities shall generally be considered the least desirable action for achieving compliance with noise standards regulations adopted by the Department of Transportation pursuant to Section 21669.

(b) Nothing in this section creates a private right of action in any civil litigation.

(c) This section is declaratory of existing regulations of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1180, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21669.2.

In its deliberations, the department shall be governed by the following guidelines:

(a) Statewide uniformity in standards of acceptable airport noise need not be required, and the maximum amount of local control and enforcement shall be permitted.

(b) Due consideration shall be given to the economic and technological feasibility of complying with the standards promulgated by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

21669.3.

Any regulations designed to establish a noise monitoring program at an airport entering service after November 30, 1971, shall go into effect on the date the airport enters service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 725, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

21669.4.

(a) The violation of the noise standards by any aircraft shall be deemed a misdemeanor and the operator thereof shall be punished by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each infraction.

(b) It shall be the function of the county wherein an airport is situated to enforce the noise regulations established by the department. To this end, the operator of an airport shall furnish to the enforcement authority designated by the county the information required by the department’s regulations to permit the efficient enforcement thereof. The operator of each airport shall reimburse the county for its costs of implementing the airport noise regulations contained in Article 8 (commencing with Section 5050) of subchapter 6 of Title 4 of the California Administrative Code, which shall, for purposes of subdivision (c), credit the operator for any amounts received from penalties assessed for violations at such airport. Upon request of the operator, the department shall review and shall determine the reasonableness of such costs, and such costs may be considered in fixing any airport user fees.

(c) Penalties assessed for the violation of the noise regulations shall be used first to reimburse the General Fund for the amount of any money appropriated to carry out the purposes for which the noise regulations are established, and second be used in the enforcement of the noise regulations at participating airports.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

21669.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) (A) “Avigation easement” means a less-than-fee-title transfer of real property rights from the property owner that may convey to an owner or operator of an airport any or all of the following rights:

(i) A right-of-way for the free and unobstructed passage of aircraft through the airspace over the property at any altitude above a specified surface.

(ii) A right to subject the property to noise, vibration, fumes, dust, and fuel particle emissions associated with normal airport
 activity.

(iii) A right to prohibit the erection or growth of any structure, tree, or other object that would enter the acquired airspace.

(iv) A right-of-entry onto the property, with proper advance notice, for the purpose of removing, marking, or lighting any structure or other object that enters the acquired airspace.

(v) A right to prohibit electrical interference, glare, misleading lights, visual impairments, and other hazards to aircraft flight from being created on the property.

(B) “Avigation easement” includes an easement obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 21652.

(2) “CNEL” means community noise equivalent level established pursuant to Chapter 6
 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 2.5 of Title 21 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) “Noise-sensitive land use” means residential uses, including detached single-family dwellings, multifamily dwellings, highrise apartments or condominiums, mobilehomes, public and private educational facilities, hospitals, convalescent homes, churches, synagogues, temples, and other places of worship.

(4) “Noise-sensitive project” means a project involving new construction or reconstruction for a planned noise-sensitive land use within an airport’s 65 decibels CNEL or higher noise contour.

(b) If a political subdivision conditions approval of a noise-sensitive project upon the grant of an avigation easement to the owner or operator of an airport, the avigation easement shall be required to be granted to the owner or
 operator of the airport prior to the issuance of the building permit that allows construction or reconstruction of the noise-sensitive project. The owner or operator of an airport that is granted an avigation easement as a condition for approval of a noise-sensitive project pursuant to this subdivision shall be entitled to immediately record it upon receipt.

(c) An avigation easement granted to the owner or operator of an airport as a condition for approval of a noise-sensitive project shall include a termination clause that operates to terminate the avigation easement if the noise-sensitive project is not built and the permit or any permit extension authorizing construction or reconstruction of the noise-sensitive project has expired or has been revoked.

(d) Within 30 days after expiration or revocation of a permit or permit extension that authorized construction or
 reconstruction of a noise-sensitive project and was conditioned upon the property owner granting an avigation easement to the owner or operator of an airport, the political subdivision that had issued the permit shall notify the owner or operator of the airport of the expiration or revocation of the permit. Within 90 days after receipt of the notice from the political subdivision, the owner or operator of the airport shall record a notice of termination with the county recorder in which the property is located. Proof of filing of the notice of termination shall be provided to the political subdivision by the owner or operator of the airport within 30 days of recordation.

(e) Notwithstanding Sections 6103 and 27383 of the Government Code, the owner or operator of an airport shall pay all applicable recording fees prescribed by law for the filing of a notice of termination pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 382, Sec. 11.5.   (SB 194)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21669.6.

Hearings under this article required by the provisions of Sections 21666, 21668, 21668.2, and 21669, or regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions, shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Airport Land Use Commission [21670. - 21679.5.]

21670.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(1) It is in the public interest to provide for the orderly development of each public use airport in this state and the area surrounding these airports so as to promote the overall goals and objectives of the California airport noise standards adopted pursuant to Section 21669 and to prevent the creation of new noise and safety problems.

(2) It is the purpose of this article to protect public health, safety, and welfare by ensuring the orderly expansion of airports and the adoption of land use measures that minimize the public’s exposure to excessive noise and safety hazards within areas around public airports to the extent that these areas are not already devoted to incompatible uses.

(b) In order to achieve the purposes of this article, every county in which there is located an airport which is served by a scheduled airline shall establish an airport land use commission. Every county, in which there is located an airport which is not served by a scheduled airline, but is operated for the benefit of the general public, shall establish an airport land use commission, except that the board of supervisors of the county may, after consultation with the appropriate airport operators and affected local entities and after a public hearing, adopt a resolution finding that there are no noise, public safety, or land use issues affecting any airport in the county which require the creation of a commission and declaring the county exempt from that requirement. The board shall, in this event, transmit a copy of the resolution to the Director of Transportation. For purposes of this section, “commission” means an airport land use commission. Each commission shall consist of seven members to be selected as follows:

(1) Two representing the cities in the county, appointed by a city selection committee comprised of the mayors of all the cities within that county, except that if there are any cities contiguous or adjacent to the qualifying airport, at least one representative shall be appointed therefrom. If there are no cities within a county, the number of representatives provided for by paragraphs (2) and (3) shall each be increased by one.

(2) Two representing the county, appointed by the board of supervisors.

(3) Two having expertise in aviation, appointed by a selection committee comprised of the managers of all of the public airports within that county.

(4) One representing the general public, appointed by the other six members of the commission.

(c) Public officers, whether elected or appointed, may be appointed and serve as members of the commission during their terms of public office.

(d) Each member shall promptly appoint a single proxy to represent him or her in commission affairs and to vote on all matters when the member is not in attendance. The proxy shall be designated in a signed written instrument which shall be kept on file at the commission offices, and the proxy shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing member. A vacancy in the office of proxy shall be filled promptly by appointment of a new proxy.

(e) A person having an “expertise in aviation” means a person who, by way of education, training, business, experience, vocation, or avocation has acquired and possesses particular knowledge of, and familiarity with, the function, operation, and role of airports, or is an elected official of a local agency which owns or operates an airport.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature to clarify that, for the purposes of this article, that special districts, school districts, and community college districts are included among the local agencies that are subject to airport land use laws and other requirements of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

21670.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, if the board of supervisors and the city selection committee of mayors in the county each makes a determination by a majority vote that proper land use planning can be accomplished through the actions of an appropriately designated body, then the body so designated shall assume the planning responsibilities of an airport land use commission as provided for in this article, and a commission need not be formed in that county.

(b) A body designated pursuant to subdivision (a) that does not include among its membership at least two members having expertise in aviation, as defined in subdivision
 (e) of Section 21670, shall, when acting in the capacity of an airport land use commission, be augmented so that body, as augmented, will have at least two members having that expertise. The commission shall be constituted pursuant to this section on and after March 1, 1988.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), and subdivision (b) of Section 21670, if the board of supervisors of a county and each affected city in that county each makes a determination that proper land use planning pursuant to this article can be accomplished pursuant to this subdivision, then a commission need not be formed in that county.

(2) If the board of supervisors of a county and each affected city makes a determination that proper land use planning may be accomplished
 and a commission is not formed pursuant to paragraph (1), that county and the appropriate affected cities having jurisdiction over an airport, subject to the review and approval by
 the Division of Aeronautics of the department, shall do all of the following:

(A) Adopt processes for the preparation, adoption, and amendment of the airport land use compatibility plan for each airport that is served by a scheduled airline or operated for the benefit of the general public.

(B) Adopt processes for the notification of the general public, landowners, interested groups, and other public agencies regarding the preparation, adoption, and amendment of the airport land use compatibility plans.

(C) Adopt processes for the mediation of disputes arising from the preparation, adoption, and amendment of the airport land use compatibility plans.

(D) Adopt processes for the amendment of general and specific plans to be consistent with the airport land use compatibility plans.

(E) Designate the agency that shall be responsible for the preparation, adoption, and amendment of each airport land use compatibility plan.

(3) The Division of Aeronautics of the department shall review the processes adopted pursuant to paragraph (2), and shall approve the processes if the division determines that the processes are consistent with the procedure required by this article and will do all of the following:

(A) Result in the preparation, adoption, and implementation of plans within a reasonable amount of time.

(B) Rely on the height, use, noise, safety, and density criteria that are compatible with airport operations, as established by this article, and referred to as the Airport Land Use Planning Handbook,
 published by the division, and any applicable federal aviation regulations, including, but not limited to, Part 77 (commencing with Section 77.1) of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) Provide adequate opportunities for notice to, review of, and comment by the general public, landowners, interested groups, and other public agencies.

(4) If the county does not comply with the requirements of paragraph (2) within 120 days, then the airport land use compatibility plan and amendments shall not be considered adopted pursuant to this article and a commission shall be established within 90 days of the determination of noncompliance by the division and an airport land use compatibility plan shall be adopted pursuant to this article within 90 days of the
 establishment of the commission.

(d) A commission need not be formed in a county that has contracted for the preparation of airport land use compatibility plans with the Division of Aeronautics under the California Aid to Airports Program (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4050) of Division 2.5 of Title 21 of the California Code of Regulations) and that submits all of the following information to the Division of Aeronautics for review and comment that the county and the cities affected by the airports within the county, as defined by the airport land use compatibility plans:

(1) Agree to adopt and implement the airport land use compatibility plans that have been developed under contract.

(2) Incorporated the
 height, use, noise, safety, and density criteria that are compatible with airport operations as established by this article, and referred to as the Airport Land Use Planning Handbook, published by the division, and any applicable federal aviation regulations, including, but not limited to, Part 77 (commencing with Section 77.1) of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as part of the general and specific plans for the county and for each affected city.

(3) If the county does not comply with this subdivision on or before May 1, 1995, then a commission shall be established in accordance with this article.

(e) (1) A commission need not be formed in a county if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The county has only one public use airport that is owned by a city.

(B) (i) The county and the affected city adopt the elements in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), as part of their general and specific plans for the county and the affected city.

(ii) The general and specific plans shall be submitted, upon adoption, to the Division of Aeronautics. If the county and the affected city do not submit the elements specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), on or before May 1, 1996, then a commission shall be established in accordance with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 5.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21670.2.

(a) Sections 21670 and 21670.1 do not apply to the County of Los Angeles. In that county, the county regional planning commission has the responsibility for coordinating the airport planning of public agencies within the county. In instances where impasses result relative to this planning, an appeal may be made to the county regional planning commission by any public agency involved. The action taken by the county regional planning commission on an appeal may be overruled by a four-fifths vote of the governing body of a public agency whose planning led to the appeal.

(b) By January 1, 1992, the county regional planning commission shall adopt the airport land use compatibility plans required pursuant to Section 21675.

(c) Sections 21675.1, 21675.2, and 21679.5 do not apply to the County of Los Angeles until January 1, 1992. If the airport land use compatibility plans required pursuant to Section 21675 are not adopted by the county regional planning commission by January 1, 1992, Sections 21675.1 and 21675.2 shall apply to the County of Los Angeles until the airport land use compatibility plans are adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 438, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21670.3.

(a) Sections 21670 and 21670.1 do not apply to the County of San Diego. In that county, the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority, as established pursuant to Section 170002, shall be responsible for the preparation, adoption, and amendment of an airport land use compatibility plan for each airport in San Diego County.

(b) The San Diego County Regional Airport Authority shall engage in a public collaborative planning process when preparing and updating an airport land use compatibility plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 287, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

21670.4.

(a) As used in this section, “intercounty airport” means any airport bisected by a county line through its runways, runway protection zones, inner safety zones, inner turning zones, outer safety zones, or sideline safety zones, as defined by the department’s Airport Land Use Planning Handbook and referenced in the airport land use compatibility plan formulated under Section 21675.

(b) It is the purpose of this section to provide the opportunity to establish a separate airport land use commission so that an intercounty airport may be served by a single airport land use planning agency, rather than having to look separately to the airport land use commissions of the affected counties.

(c) In addition to the airport land use commissions created under Section 21670 or the alternatives established under Section 21670.1, for their respective counties, the boards of supervisors and city selection committees for the affected counties, by independent majority vote of each county’s two delegations, for any intercounty airport, may do either of the following:

(1) Establish a single separate airport land use commission for that airport. That commission shall consist of seven members to be selected as follows:

(A) One representing the cities in each of the counties, appointed by that county’s city selection committee.

(B) One representing each of the counties, appointed by the board of supervisors of each county.

(C) One from each county having expertise in aviation, appointed by a selection committee comprised of the managers of all the public airports within that county.

(D) One representing the general public, appointed by the other six members of the commission.

(2) In accordance with subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 21670.1, designate an existing appropriate entity as that airport’s land use commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 438, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21670.6.

Any action brought in the superior court relating to this article may be subject to a mediation proceeding conducted pursuant to Chapter 9.3 (commencing with Section 66030) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 699, Sec. 37.   (SB 894)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21671.

In any county where there is an airport operated for the general public which is owned by a city or district in another county or by another county, one of the representatives provided by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 21670 shall be appointed by the city selection committee of mayors of the cities of the county in which the owner of that airport is located, and one of the representatives provided by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 21670 shall be appointed by the board of supervisors of the county in which the owner of that airport is located.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1117, Sec. 4) by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1018, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

21671.5.

(a) Except for the terms of office of the members of the first commission, the term of office of each member shall be four years and until the appointment and qualification of his or her successor. The members of the first commission shall classify themselves by lot so that the term of office of one member is one year, of two members is two years, of two members is three years, and of two members is four years. The body that originally appointed a member whose term has expired shall appoint his or her successor for a full term of four years. Any member may be removed at any time and without cause by the body appointing that member. The expiration date of the term of office of each member shall be the first Monday in May in the year in which that member’s term is to expire. Any vacancy in the membership of the commission shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the body which originally appointed the member whose office has become vacant. The chairperson of the commission shall be selected by the members thereof.

(b) Compensation, if any, shall be determined by the board of supervisors.

(c) Staff assistance, including the mailing of notices and the keeping of minutes and necessary quarters, equipment, and supplies shall be provided by the county. The usual and necessary operating expenses of the commission shall be a county charge. 

(d) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the commission shall not employ any personnel either as employees or independent contractors without the prior approval of the board of supervisors. 
